Utah statutes.
63C-13-107.   Compensation and expenses of authority members.

(1)  Salaries and expenses of authority members who are legislators shall be paid in accordance with Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Chapter 3, Expense and Mileage Reimbursement for Authorized Legislative Meetings, Special Sessions, and Veto Override Sessions.

(2)  An authority member who is not a legislator may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service on the authority, but may receive per diem and reimbursement for travel expenses incurred as an authority member at the rates established by the Division of Finance under:

(a)  Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107; and

(b)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Enacted by Chapter 228, 2013 General Session

